Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.20.030

Commission—Additional powers. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

In addition to the duties in RCW 29B.20.020, the commission may:

(1) Adopt, amend, and rescind suitable administrative rules to carry out the policies and purposes of this title, which rules shall be adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW. Any rule relating to campaign finance, political advertising, or related forms that would otherwise take effect after June 30th of a general election year shall take effect no earlier than the day following the general election in that year;

(2) Appoint an executive director and set, within the limits established by the office of financial management under RCW 43.03.028, the executive director's compensation. The executive director shall perform such duties and have such powers as the commission may prescribe and delegate to implement and enforce this title efficiently and effectively. The commission shall not delegate its authority to adopt, amend, or rescind rules nor may it delegate authority to determine that a violation of this title has occurred or to assess penalties for such violations;

(3) Prepare and publish reports and technical studies as in its judgment will tend to promote the purposes of this title, including reports and statistics concerning campaign financing, lobbying, financial interests of elected officials, and enforcement of this title;

(4) Conduct, as it deems appropriate, audits and field investigations;

(5) Make public the time and date of any formal hearing set to determine whether a violation has occurred, the question or questions to be considered, and the results thereof;

(6) Administer oaths and affirmations, issue subpoenas, and compel attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any records relevant to any investigation authorized under this title, or any other proceeding under this title;

(7) Adopt a code of fair campaign practices;

(8) Adopt rules relieving candidates or political committees of obligations to comply with election campaign provisions of this title, if they have not received contributions nor made expenditures in connection with any election campaign of more than *five thousand dollars;

(9) Develop and provide to filers a system for certification of reports required under this title which are transmitted electronically to the commission. Implementation of the program is contingent on the availability of funds; and

(10) Make available and keep current on its website a glossary of all defined terms in this title and in rules adopted by the commission.

[ 2024 c 164 s 409; 2019 c 428 s 8; 2018 c 304 s 4; 2015 c 225 s 55. Prior: 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 448; 2011 c 60 s 20; prior: 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 4; 2010 c 204 s 303; 1995 c 397 s 17; 1994 c 40 s 3; 1986 c 155 s 11; 1985 c 367 s 11; 1984 c 34 s 7; 1977 ex.s. c 336 s 7; 1975 1st ex.s. c 294 s 25; 1973 c 1 s 37 (Initiative Measure No. 276, approved November 7, 1972). Formerly RCW 42.17A.110, 42.17.370.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The dollar amounts in this section may have been adjusted for inflation by rule of the commission adopted under the authority of RCW 29B.20.050. For current dollar amounts, see WAC 390-05-400.

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Finding—Effective date—2019 c 428: See notes following RCW 29B.20.110.

Finding—Intent—2018 c 304: See note following RCW 29B.25.090.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 448: "Section 448 of this act takes effect January 1, 2012." [ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 481.]

Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See note following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—2011 c 60: "This act takes effect January 1, 2012." [ 2011 c 60 s 53. Formerly RCW 42.17A.919.]

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Effective date—1995 c 397: See note following RCW 29B.40.020.

Findings—1994 c 40: "The legislature finds that government information is a strategic resource and needs to be managed as such and that broad public access to nonrestricted public information and records must be guaranteed. The legislature further finds that reengineering government processes along with capitalizing on advancements made in digital technology can build greater efficiencies in government service delivery. The legislature further finds that providing citizen electronic access to presently available public documents will allow increased citizen involvement in state policies and empower citizens to participate in state policy decision making." [ 1994 c 40 s 1.]

Effective date—1994 c 40: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [March 21, 1994]." [ 1994 c 40 s 7.]

Contingent effective date—Severability—1986 c 155: See notes following RCW 43.03.300.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 336: See note following RCW 29B.25.020.

Effective date—Construction—1973 c 1: See notes following RCW 29B.05.010.